Illinois, session 104th, SB1736.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-2 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-2)7    Sec. 27-2. Instruction in English language. Instruction in 8all public elementary and and secondary schools of the State 9shall be in the English language except in second language 10programs and except in conjunction with programs which the 11school board may provide, with the approval of the State Board 12of Education pursuant to Article 14C, in a language other than 13English for children whose first language is other than 14English.15(Source: P.A. 85-1389.)